Missouri, session 2026, SB1428.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 161 and 173, RSMo, are amended by
adding thereto two new sections, to be known as sections 161.581
and 173.581, to read as follows:
161.581. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "COVID-19", any disease or health condition caused
by the novel coronavirus named "SARS-CoV-2", the
international outbreak of respiratory disease named
"coronavirus disease 2019" and abbreviated as "COVID-19", or
any variant of or virus mutating from SARS-CoV-2 or COVID-19;
(2) "COVID-19 vaccine", a substance used to stimulate
the production of antibodies and provide protection against
COVID-19, prepared from the causative agent of COVID-19, its
products, or a synthetic substitute, and treated to act as
an antigen without inducing a COVID-19 infection;
(3) "Public school", the same definition as in section
160.011;
(4) "School district", the same definition as in
section 160.011;

SB 1428 2
(5) "School employee", any teacher, substitute
teacher, supervisor, principal, supervising principal,
superintendent, assistant superintendent, or other
individual who is employed by a school district or a public
school.
2. Beginning in the 2026-27 school year and for each
subsequent school year, no school district, public school,
or school employee shall require any school employee or any
student of such school district or public school to:
(1) Receive any COVID-19 vaccine or gene therapy
treatment before being physically present at any of the
school district's or public school's events, premises, or
facilities;
(2) Receive any COVID-19 vaccine or gene therapy
treatment before being accepted for employment by the school
district or public school or as a condition of acceptance as
a student in the school district's public schools; or
(3) Submit to any testing for COVID-19 without the
express written consent of the school employee or, in the
case of a student, all parents, guardians, or other persons
having charge, control, or custody of the student.
3. (1) The department of elementary and secondary
education shall investigate any report of a violation of
this section. If the department determines that any school
district, public school, or school employee has violated
this section, the department shall notify the violator of
the violation and order the violator to immediately cease
and desist any further activity in violation of this section.
(2) If a school employee violates this section and
such school employee possesses a certificate of license to
teach in the public schools of this state, the state board
of education may, upon hearing, suspend or revoke such

SB 1428 3
school employee's certificate of license to teach pursuant
to the provisions of section 168.071.
(3) Any student, parent or guardian of such student,
or school employee may bring a civil action against a
violator of this section for appropriate injunctive relief
or actual damages, or both, for any physical, mental, or
emotional injuries sustained by such individual as a result
of a school district's, public school's, or school
employee's violation of this section. Such action shall be
brought in the county where the violation occurred, and the
court shall award damages and court costs to a prevailing
plaintiff.
(4) A school district that violates any provision of
this section shall not be entitled to receive state aid
under chapter 163 or any other revenues of the state until
the school district proves to the satisfaction of the
department of elementary and secondary education that the
school district is no longer in violation of this section.
173.581. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "COVID-19", any disease or health condition caused
by the novel coronavirus named "SARS-CoV-2", the
international outbreak of respiratory disease named
"coronavirus disease 2019" and abbreviated as "COVID-19", or
any variant of or virus mutating from SARS-CoV-2 or COVID-19;
(2) "COVID-19 vaccine", a substance used to stimulate
the production of antibodies and provide protection against
COVID-19, prepared from the causative agent of COVID-19, its
products, or a synthetic substitute, and treated to act as
an antigen without inducing a COVID-19 infection;
(3) "Employee", any individual who is employed by an
institution of higher education;

SB 1428 4
(4) "Institution of higher education", any institution
of postsecondary education that receives any public funding
and is subject to any governance or regulation by the
coordinating board of higher education under state law.
2. Beginning in the 2026-27 academic year and for each
subsequent academic year, no institution of higher education
or employee shall require any employee or student to:
(1) Receive any COVID-19 vaccine or gene therapy
treatment before being physically present at any of the
institution's events, premises, or facilities;
(2) Receive any COVID-19 vaccine or gene therapy
treatment before being accepted for employment by the
institution or as a condition of acceptance as a student at
the institution; or
(3) Submit to any testing for COVID-19 without the
express written consent of the employee or student.
3. (1) The department of higher education and
workforce development shall investigate any report of a
violation of this section. If the department determines
that any institution of higher education or employee of an
institution of higher education has violated this section,
the department shall notify the violator of the violation
and order the violator to immediately cease and desist any
further activity in violation of this section.
(2) An institution of higher education that violates
any provision of this section shall not be entitled to
receive state aid under this chapter or any other revenues
of the state until such institution proves to the
satisfaction of the department of higher education and
workforce development that such institution is no longer in
violation of this section.

SB 1428 5
(3) Any student or employee of an institution of
higher education may bring a civil action against a violator
of this section for appropriate injunctive relief or actual
damages, or both, for any physical, mental, or emotional
injuries sustained by such individual as a result of a
violation of this section by an institution of higher
education or an employee thereof. Such action shall be
brought in the county where the violation occurred, and the
court shall award damages and court costs to a prevailing
plaintiff.
✓